Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1864] `Ulu`ulu: The Henry Ku`ualoha Giugni Moving Image
Archive of Hawai`i.
`Ulu`ulu: The Henry Ku`ualoha Giugni Moving Image
Archive of Hawai`i is
designated as the official state archive for moving images. The qualifying
standards and conditions related to the receipt of funds contained in chapter
42F shall not apply to funds received by `Ulu`ulu: The Henry Ku`ualoha Giugni Moving Image
Archive of Hawai`i;
provided that if the archive contracts with a recipient or provider, the
qualifying standards, conditions, and other provisions of chapter 42F shall
apply to the recipient or provider and the contract. [L 2012, c 90, §2]

Cross References

For special fund, see §304A-2180.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next